Missouri, session 2026, SB1789.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 558.016, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 558.016,
to read as follows:
558.016. 1. The court may sentence a person who has
been found guilty of an offense to a term of imprisonment as
authorized by section 558.011 or to a term of imprisonment
authorized by a statute governing the offense if it finds
the defendant is a prior offender or a persistent
misdemeanor offender. The court [may] shall sentence a
person to an extended term of imprisonment if:
(1) The defendant is a persistent offender or a
dangerous offender, and the person is sentenced under
subsection 7 of this section;
(2) The statute under which the person was found
guilty contains a sentencing enhancement provision that is
based on a prior finding of guilt or a finding of prior
criminal conduct and the person is sentenced according to
the statute; or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1789 2
(3) A more specific sentencing enhancement provision
applies that is based on a prior finding of guilt or a
finding of prior criminal conduct.
2. A "prior offender" is one who has been found guilty
of one felony.
3. A "persistent offender" is one who has been found
guilty of two or more felonies committed at different times,
or one who has been previously found guilty of a dangerous
felony as defined in subdivision (19) of section 556.061.
4. A "dangerous offender" is one who:
(1) Is being sentenced for a felony during the
commission of which he knowingly murdered or endangered or
threatened the life of another person or knowingly inflicted
or attempted or threatened to inflict serious physical
injury on another person; and
(2) Has been found guilty of a class A or B felony or
a dangerous felony.
5. A "persistent misdemeanor offender" is one who has
been found guilty of two or more offenses, committed at
different times that are classified as A or B misdemeanors
under the laws of this state.
6. The findings of guilt shall be prior to the date of
commission of the present offense.
7. The court shall sentence a person, who has been
found to be a persistent offender or a dangerous offender,
and is found guilty of a class B, C, D, or E felony to the
authorized term of imprisonment for the offense that is one
class higher than the offense for which the person is found
guilty.
✓